Washington statutes.
RCW 19.31.110

Expiration date of license—Reinstatement.

An employment agency license shall expire June 30th. Any such license not renewed may be reinstated if the employment agency can show good cause to the director for renewal of the license and present proof of intent to continue to act as an employment agency: PROVIDED, That no license shall be issued upon such application for reinstatement until all fees and penalties previously accrued under this chapter have been paid.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 51 s 6; 1969 ex.s. c 228 s 11.]